Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.290

Ordinances—Style—Signatures.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows: "Be it ordained by the council of the town of . . . . ."

Every ordinance shall be signed by the mayor and attested by the clerk.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.290. Prior: 1917 c 99 s 1, part; 1890 p 204 s 155, part; RRS s 9178, part.]